nl: Keu schroefdraadmaat: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Overig
nb: Størrelse på tråden: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radiell; Uni-Loc; Annet
it: Tagliata thread di cue: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radiale; Uni-Loc; Altro
da: Køtrådstørrelse: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Andet
de: Queue-Gewindegröße: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Sonstige
cs: Velikost závitu tága: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radiální; Uni-Loc; Ostatní
el: Μέγεθος σπειρώματος στέκας: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Άλλο
th: ขนาดเกลียวของไม้คิว: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; แรเดียล; Uni-Loc; อื่นๆ
es: Tamaño de la rosca del taco: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Otro
hr-HR: Veličina poruke je niska: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radijalno; Uni-Loc; Ostalo
sv: Cue tråd storlek: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tamanho thread sinalização: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Outro
bg-BG: Размер на резбата на щеката: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Други
ru: Размер резьбы кия: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Другое
pt-BR: Tamanho da rosca do taco: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Outro
zh-TW: 球桿螺紋尺寸: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; 其他
vi: Kích thước ren cơ bi-a: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Xuyên tâm; Uni-Loc; Khác
tr: İsteka vida diş ölçüsü: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Diğer
fi: Kepin kierrekoko: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Muu
sk-SK: Veľkosť závitu tága: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radiálny; Uni-Loc; Iné
en: Cue thread size: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Other
fr: Dimension du filetage de queue: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Autre
ja: キュースレッドサイズ: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; ラジアル; Uni-Loc; その他
hu: Dákó szálmérete: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radiál; Uni-Loc; Egyéb
ko: 큐 나사산 규격: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; 레디얼; 유니락; 기타
zh-CN: 球杆螺纹规格: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; 其他
pl: Rozmiar gwintu kija: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Promienisty / Radial; Uni-Loc; Inne
lt-LT: Lazdos sriegio dydis: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radialinis; „Uni-Loc“; Kita
sl-SI: Navoj biljardne palice: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Drugo
ro-RO: Dimensiunea fir tac: 3/8 x 10; 3/8 x 14; 5/16 x 14; 5/16 x 18; M10; M12; QR2; Radial; Uni-Loc; Altele